Utah statutes.
31A-12-107.   Governmental immunity.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this title, a governmental entity is not an insurer for purposes of this title and is not engaged in the business of insurance to the extent that it is:

(1)  covering its own liabilities under Title 63G, Chapter 7, Governmental Immunity Act of Utah; or

(2)  engaging in other related risk management activities related to the normal course of its activities.

